Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-431 Termination of proceedings. (a)
A conservatorship terminates upon the death of the protected person or upon
order of the court. Unless created for reasons other than that the protected
person is a minor, a conservatorship created for a minor also terminates when
the protected person attains majority or is emancipated.

(b) Within sixty days of the death of the
protected person, the attainment of majority by a minor, or upon order of the
court, the conservator shall file a final report and petition for discharge.

(c) On petition of a protected person, a
conservator, or another person interested in a protected person's welfare, the
court may terminate the conservatorship if the protected person no longer needs
the assistance or protection of a conservator. Termination of the
conservatorship does not affect a conservator's liability for previous acts or
the obligation to account for funds and assets of the protected person.

(d) Except as otherwise ordered by the court
for good cause, before terminating a conservatorship, the court shall follow
the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the protected person that apply
to a petition for conservatorship. Upon the establishment of a prima facie
case for termination, the court shall order termination unless it is proved
that continuation of the conservatorship is in the best interest of the
protected person.

(e) Upon termination of a conservatorship and
whether or not formally distributed by the conservator, title to assets of the
estate passes to the formerly protected person or the person's successors. The
order of termination shall provide for expenses of administration and direct
the conservator to execute appropriate instruments to evidence the transfer of
title or confirm a distribution previously made and to file a final report and
a petition for discharge upon approval of the final report.

(f) The court shall enter a final order of
discharge upon the approval of the final report and satisfaction by the
conservator of any other conditions placed by the court on the conservator's
discharge. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next